Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-712.02
Military family advocacy program; child abuse or neglect; notify military installation.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Military family advocacy program means the program established by the United States Department of Defense and provided at a military installation to address child abuse and neglect in military families; and

(b) Military installation has the same meaning as in section 79-2201.

(2) Upon receipt of a report of child abuse or neglect, and after the department has contacted the family of the identified victim and determined that the subject of the report is a member of a military family, the department shall notify the appropriate military installation with which it has a memorandum of understanding under subsection (3) of this section of the report and the nature of the allegations contained in the report.

(3) The department shall negotiate a memorandum of understanding with each military installation in Nebraska that has a military family advocacy program. The memorandum shall establish procedures and protocols for:

(a) Identifying the subject of a report of child abuse or neglect as a member of a military family;

(b) Sharing information as required by this section; and

(c) Maintaining confidentiality as required by state and federal law.

(4) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 32.